Maryland, session 2025, HB1260.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
8–721.
(a) In this section, “abandoned or sunken vessel” means [any]:
(1) ANY vessel that:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1260*

HOUSE BILL 1260
[(1)] (I) Is left illegally or has remained without permission for more than
30 days on public property, including public marinas, docks, or boatyards;
[(2)] (II) Has remained at the following locations for more than 60 days
without the consent of the owner or person in control of the property:
[(i)] 1. A private marina or property operated by a private
marina; or
[(ii)] 2. A private boatyard or property operated by a private
boatyard;
[(3)] (III) Has remained at the following locations for more than 30 days
without the consent of the owner or person in control of the property:
[(i)] 1. A private dock; or
[(ii)] 2. At or near waters’ edge on private property;
[(4)] (IV) Has remained on private property other than the private
property described in items [(2)] (II) and [(3)] (III) of this [subsection] ITEM for more than
180 days without the consent of the owner or person in control of the property; or
[(5) (i)] (V) 1. Has been found adrift or unattended in or upon the
waters of the State and:
[1.] A. Is found in a condition of disrepair;
[2.] B. Presents a hazard or obstruction to the use of the
waters of the State; or
[3.] C. Presents a potential health or environmental
hazard; and
[(ii)] 2. Is not:
[1.] A. Historic property as defined in § 5A–301 of the State
Finance and Procurement Article; or
[2.] B. Submerged archaeological historic property as
defined in § 5A–333 of the State Finance and Procurement Article; OR
(2) A RECREATIONAL VESSEL THAT:

HOUSE BILL 1260 3
(I) MEETS ANY OF THE CRITERIA UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION;
(II) HAS REMAINED TIED TO A PRIVATELY OWNED APPARATUS
USED TO SECURE, BERTH, OR MOOR VESSELS IN THE WATERS OF THE STATE FOR
MORE THAN 60 DAYS WITHOUT THE CONSENT OF THE OWNER OR PERSON IN
CONTROL OF THE APPARATUS; OR
(III) HAS REMAINED ANCHORED AND UNATTENDED IN THE SAME
LOCATION FOR MORE THAN 60 DAYS.
(b) (1) The Department may seize, remove, and take into custody any
abandoned or sunken vessel.
(2) For this purpose, the Department may use its own personnel,
equipment, and facilities or use other persons, equipment, and facilities for removing,
preserving, or storing abandoned or sunken vessels.
(3) The Department, or a person removing, preserving, or storing an
abandoned or sunken vessel on behalf of the Department, may not be held liable for any
damage to an abandoned or sunken vessel which may occur during removal, storage, or
custody of the vessel.
(c) (1) Except as provided in subsection (g)(2) of this section, not later than 15
days before an abandoned or sunken vessel is seized, removed, or taken into custody under
subsection (b) of this section, the Department shall:
(i) Send a notice, by certified mail, return receipt requested, bearing
a postmark from the United States Postal Service to the registered owner of the vessel, as
shown on the records of the Department; and
(ii) Attempt, by telephone or e–mail, to contact:
1. The registered owner of the vessel at the telephone
number or e–mail address shown on the records of the Department; and
2. If the application for a certificate of number under §
8–712(b) of this subtitle includes an alternate emergency contact, the alternate emergency
contact.
(2) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, as
soon as reasonably possible but not later than 15 days after the Department takes an
abandoned or sunken vessel into custody, the Department shall:

HOUSE BILL 1260
1. Send a notice, by certified mail, return receipt requested,
bearing a postmark from the United States Postal Service to the registered owner of the
vessel and to each known secured party, as shown on the records of the Department; and
2. Attempt, by telephone or e–mail, to contact:
A. The registered owner of the vessel at the telephone
number or e–mail address shown on the records of the Department; and
B. If the application for a certificate of number under §
8–712(b) of this subtitle includes an alternate emergency contact, the alternate emergency
contact.
(ii) As soon as reasonably possible but not later than 15 days after
the Department takes an abandoned or sunken vessel into custody in accordance with
subsection (g)(2) of this section, the Department shall:
1. Send a notice, by certified mail, return receipt requested,
bearing a postmark from the United States Postal Service to the last known registered
owner of the vessel and to each known secured party, as shown on the records of the
Department; and
2. Attempt, by telephone or e–mail, to contact:
A. The registered owner of the vessel at the telephone
number or e–mail address shown on the records of the Department; and
B. If the application for a certificate of number under §
8–712(b) of this subtitle includes an alternate emergency contact, the alternate emergency
contact.
(d) The notices required by subsection (c) of this section shall:
(1) Describe the vessel;
(2) If the vessel was taken into custody in accordance with subsection (g)(2)
of this section, describe the actual or potential hazard mitigated by removal of the vessel;
(3) Give the location where the vessel is being held;
(4) Inform the owner and secured party of a right to reclaim the vessel
within 3 weeks of receipt of the notice required in subsection (c)(2) of this section upon
payment to the Department of any expenses incurred during removal and custody of the
vessel; and
(5) State that failure to claim the vessel will constitute:

HOUSE BILL 1260 5
(i) A waiver of all right, title, and interest in the vessel; and
(ii) A consent to the Department’s disposition of the vessel.
(e) (1) If the Department is unable to determine the last registered owner or
the identity of any secured party of the abandoned or sunken vessel, or if the certified mail
notice required under subsection (c) of this section is returned as undeliverable and
telephone calls and e–mails are unanswered, unreturned, or undeliverable, the Department
shall give the required notice:
(i) By publication in at least 1 newspaper of general circulation in
the area where the abandoned or sunken vessel was found;
(ii) Through digital media, including posting on the Department’s
website and social media platforms; or
(iii) By attaching to the vessel in a clearly visible place a distinctively
colored notification sticker or tag that contains the following information:
1. The date and time the notification was affixed to the
vessel;
2. A statement that, in accordance with this section, if the
vessel is not removed within 60 days after the date the notification sticker or tag was
affixed, the vessel may be seized, removed, taken into custody and sold at public auction,
acquired by title under § 8–722 of this subtitle, or otherwise disposed of; and
3. The location and telephone number where additional
information may be obtained.
(2) The notice by publication shall contain the information required under
subsection (d) of this section and shall be published within 30 days of the seizure of the
abandoned or sunken vessel, or within 15 days of:
(i) The return of the certified mail notice as undeliverable; and
(ii) The attempt, by telephone or e–mail, to contact the registered
owner.
(f) If the owner or secured party fails to claim the abandoned or sunken vessel
within 3 weeks after the notice required under subsection (c) of this section or after the
notice by publication is given or within 60 days after the notice authorized under subsection
(e)(1)(iii) of this section, the Department may sell the vessel at public auction, proceed to
receive title to the vessel pursuant to § 8–722 of this subtitle, or otherwise dispose of the
vessel.

HOUSE BILL 1260
(g) (1) If the abandoned or sunken vessel is in such a condition of disrepair
that the Department cannot remove the vessel intact, the Department may dispose of the
vessel in whatever manner is reasonable without providing the notice required under
subsections (c) through (e) of this section.
(2) (i) If the Department determines that an abandoned or sunken
vessel poses an immediate hazard or obstruction to navigation, a potential health hazard,
or a potential environmental hazard, the Department shall take the vessel into custody
without providing the notice required under subsection (c)(1) of this section.
(ii) The Department shall keep a written record of a determination
made under this paragraph, including the actual or potential hazards mitigated by removal
of the vessel.
(h) The Department may delegate the Department’s authority to remove and
dispose of abandoned or sunken vessels under this section to any local jurisdiction that
consents to the delegation.
(i) The Department, in consultation with the Director of the Maryland Historical
Trust, may adopt regulations to implement this section.
(j) The Department may [not] use funds budgeted for the Natural Resources
Police for the purpose of removing or storing abandoned or sunken vessels under this
section.
(K) FOR THE PURPOSES OF DETERMINING WHETHER A RECREATIONAL
VESSEL MEETS THE CRITERIA FOR AN ABANDONED OR SUNKEN VESSEL UNDER
SUBSECTION (A)(2)(II) OR (III) OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
CONSIDER AND DOCUMENT:
(1) WHETHER THE VESSEL HAS A VALID, CURRENT REGISTRATION;
(2) ANY STANDING WATER IN THE VESSEL;
(3) THE CONDITION OF THE VESSEL;
(4) IF THE VESSEL IS ANCHORED, WHETHER THE VESSEL IS
EQUIPPED WITH AN ANCHOR LIGHT; AND
(5) IF THE VESSEL IS MOORED, THE CONDITION OF THE EQUIPMENT
USED TO MOOR THE VESSEL.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.